Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2285.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1402(a.1) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1402. Health Services.--* * *(a.1) Every child of school age shall be provided with school nurse services: Provided, however, That each school building attended by students shall be assigned at least one school nurse and the number of pupils under the care of each school nurse shall not exceed [one thousand five hundred (1,500)] seven hundred fifty (750).1234567891011121314151617181920 * * *Section 2. Section 2505.1(b.1) and (b.2)(1) of the act, added July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), are amended to read:Section 2505.1. State Reimbursement for Health Services.--* * *(b.1) Every school district which renders health services to children shall be reimbursed by the Commonwealth on account of health services which conform to standards approved by the Secretary of Health. Reimbursement shall be paid by the Secretary of Health. For the school year 1990-1991, the amount of this reimbursement for this subsection shall be the sum of five dollars and ninety cents ($5.90) multiplied by the average daily membership of each school district. [For the school year 1991-1992 and each school year thereafter] For school years 1991-1992 through 2025-2026, the amount of this reimbursement for this subsection shall be the sum of nine dollars and seventy cents ($9.70) multiplied by the average daily membership of each school district. For school year 2026-2027 and each school year thereafter, the amount of this reimbursement for this subsection shall be the sum of twelve dollars and sixty-one cents ($12.61) multiplied by the average daily membership of each school district. Reimbursement under this subsection may not exceed the actual cost to the school district for health services in the school year.(b.2) (1) From money appropriated for school health services, the Department of Health, in consultation with the Department of Education, [may] shall use up to $3,000,000 to award grants for feminine hygiene products to school entities to be provided to students at no expense. Grants shall be awarded in an amount that is proportional to the number of students 20260HB2285PN2992 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enrolled in a school entity.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2285PN2992 - 3 - 123